Hawaii, session 2025, SB1628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that according to the 2024 Homeless Counts by State, Hawaii is ranked fifth in the nation for highest rates per capita of homelessness.  The 2024 Oahu Point in Time Count reported that among homeless persons, sheltered and unsheltered:  forty per cent were chronically homeless; twenty-six per cent self-reported substance abuse problems; thirty-three per cent self-reported a mental illness; fifty-five per cent reported one or more disabling conditions; and thirty-six per cent reported a physical, developmental, or other disability.  The 2024 Bridging the Gap Point in Time Count reported that of the 1,276 unsheltered individuals, forty per cent reported a mental illness and thirty-four per cent reported having a substance use disorder. The legislature further finds that homeless individuals suffering from behavioral health conditions are often high users of hospital emergency departments, which costs the State's health system millions of dollars each year for emergency ambulance transportation and emergency mental health evaluations. These frequent utilizers of emergency and homeless services often present with co-occurring illnesses and need specialized care that requires clinical expertise to evaluate their physical and mental impairments and to assist in overcoming barriers to accessing proper medical treatment and resources to meet basic needs like food, hygiene, safety, and transportation. The legislature also finds that the ʻImi Ola Piha homeless triage and treatment center, piloted by The Institute for Human Services through a grant-in-aid since June 5, 2023, has been successful in moving homeless individuals off the street by facilitating the first step of detoxing from addiction to alcohol and other drugs, including opioids and methamphetamine.  During its initial seventeen months of operation, through collaboration with police, outreach specialists, and other community providers, the eight-bed service site has triaged well over four hundred referrals for treatment.  Of the three hundred sixty-five clients taken in, the triage and treatment center has successfully detoxed three hundred fifty-four clients with medically assisted withdrawal management and stabilized the mental illness of one hundred thirty-four clients.  The triage and treatment center has also transitioned individuals who were detoxed and stabilized into appropriate treatment and housing situations, providing services for individuals residing in every county throughout the State. The lack of triage and treatment services has been a major gap in the State's system of behavioral health care for homeless persons and others with mental illness or substance use disorders.  When a person is ready and seeking treatment, they should be able to access it immediately. This is particularly true for those who suffer from substance use disorders for whom the window of contemplation about the benefits of treatment is often brief and fleeting.  The safety and constant supervision available in a triage and treatment center is in stark contrast to the chaos and vulnerability individuals experience on the street.  Furthermore, trauma-informed services based in the community foster active client participation and support, which are critical to effective engagement in treatment and patient retention and success for the individual upon exiting the treatment center. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Support existing crisis intervention programs by implementing a homeless triage and treatment center program for homeless individuals and individuals at risk of being homeless within the alcohol and drug abuse division in the department of health; and (2)  Appropriate funds to the department of health to implement a homeless triage and treatment center program. SECTION 2.  Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321-     Alcohol and drug abuse division; homeless triage and treatment center program; establishment.  (a)  The department shall establish a homeless triage and treatment center program within the alcohol and drug abuse division that focuses on serving homeless individuals and individuals at risk of homelessness with substance abuse issues or mental illness. (b)  The homeless triage and treatment center program shall: (1)  Provide access to emergency food, shelter, housing navigation, and supportive services; (2)  Collaborate with existing homeless outreach and case management services; (3)  Provide medical assessments; (4)  Provide substance abuse treatment and detoxification services; (5)  Provide behavioral health services; and (6)  Provide trauma-informed, cultural-based life skills groups for participants to maximize engagement and retention. (c)  The alcohol and drug abuse division shall work in cooperation with local hospitals, rehabilitation facilities, law enforcement agencies, and homeless service providers in establishing the homeless triage and treatment center program. (d)  The alcohol and drug abuse division may contract with facilities that provide comprehensive triage services to homeless individuals suffering from substance abuse issues or mental illness to carry out the homeless triage and treatment center program." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to implement the homeless triage and treatment center program pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________